New York, session 2025-2026, S7047.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 8-600 of the 2 election law, as amended by chapter 781 of the laws of 2021, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (b) The largest city in the county or, if there is no city in the 5 county, the municipality with the highest population in each county 6 based on the latest federal decennial census, or the county seat in 7 Washington county, or the county seat in Madison county, shall have at 8 least one polling place designated for early voting, and to the extent 9 practicable if such city or municipality has public transportation 10 routes, such polling place shall be situated along such transportation 11 routes. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025 and shall apply to any 13 general, primary, run-off primary, or special election held thereafter. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11414-01-5